Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.08.030

Number and election of directors.

(1) A board of directors must consist of one or more individuals.

(2) Unless the articles of incorporation under RCW 23B.08.010 or an agreement among the shareholders under RCW 23B.07.320 dispense with a board of directors, the articles of incorporation or bylaws must either specify the number of directors or specify the process by which the number of directors will be fixed.

(3) Directors are elected at the first annual shareholders' meeting and at each annual meeting thereafter unless (a) their terms are staggered under RCW 23B.08.060, or (b) their terms are otherwise governed by RCW 23B.05.050. Directors also may be elected by execution of a shareholder consent under RCW 23B.07.040.

[ 2020 c 194 s 7; 2009 c 189 s 23; 2007 c 467 s 1; 2002 c 297 s 27; 1994 c 256 s 29; 1989 c 165 s 82.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.